North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03 Legislative Assembly
54-03-28.
Health insurance mandated coverage of services — Cost-benefit analysis requirement.

If the legislative management determines a legislative measure mandates health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services, the measure may not be referred to a committee of the legislative assembly unless a cost-benefit analysis provided by the legislative management is appended to that measure.

If a committee of the legislative assembly determines a measure mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment of specified providers was referred to committee without a cost-benefit analysis, the committee shall request the legislative management provide a cost-benefit analysis. The committee may not act on the measure unless the measure is accompanied by the cost-benefit analysis.

If a committee of the legislative assembly determines a proposed amendment to a measure mandates health insurance coverage of services or payment of specified providers, the committee may not act on the proposed amendment unless the amendment is accompanied by a cost-benefit analysis or amended cost-benefit analysis provided by the legislative management.

Factors considered in the cost-benefit analysis must include:

The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the cost of the service.

The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase the appropriate use of the service.

The extent to which the proposed mandate would increase or decrease the administrative expenses of insurers and the premium and administrative expenses of insureds.

The impact of the proposed mandate on the total cost of health care.

A committee of the legislative assembly may not act on a legislative measure that the legislative management or committee determines mandates health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services unless the measure as recommended by the committee provides:

The measure is effective through June thirtieth of the next odd-numbered year following the year in which the legislative assembly enacted the measure, and after that date the measure is ineffective.

The application of the mandate is limited to the public employees health insurance program and the public employee retiree health insurance program. The application of such mandate begins with every contract for health insurance which becomes effective after June thirtieth of the year in which the measure becomes effective.

That for the next legislative assembly, the public employees retirement system shall prepare and request introduction of a bill to repeal the expiration date and to extend the mandated coverage or payment to apply to accident and health insurance policies. The public employees retirement system shall append to the bill a report regarding the effect of the mandated coverage or payment on the system’s health insurance programs. The report must include information on the utilization and costs relating to the mandated coverage or payment and a recommendation on whether the coverage or payment should continue. For purposes of this section, the bill is not a legislative measure mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services, unless the bill is amended following introduction so as to change the bill’s mandate.

The legislative management shall adopt a procedure for identifying measures and proposed measures mandating health insurance coverage of services or payment for specified providers of services. The procedure must include solicitation of draft measures and proposals during the interim between legislative sessions from legislators and agencies with bill introduction privileges and must include deadlines for identification of the measures or proposals.

The legislative council shall contract with a private entity, after receiving one or more recommendations from the insurance commissioner, to provide the legislative management the cost-benefit analysis required by this section. The insurance commissioner shall pay the cost of the contracted services to the entity providing the services.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 471, § 1; 2003, ch. 240, § 6; 2021, ch. 391, § 2, effective May 1, 2021.

54-03-29.
Acceptance of gifts — Continuing appropriation.

The legislative assembly or either house of the legislative assembly may accept donations of funds. Funds received as a donation may be expended by the legislative assembly by concurrent resolution or the appropriate house upon motion. All funds under this section are appropriated as a continuing appropriation for the purposes contained in the concurrent resolution or motion approving the expenditure of the funds.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 454, § 1.

54-03-30.
Audio recording of floor sessions.

The senate shall adopt rules regarding the recording of senate floor sessions and the house of representatives shall adopt rules regarding the recording of house floor sessions. The legislative council shall archive all audio recordings of floor sessions. Audio recordings of floor sessions are public records that must be open and accessible for inspection during reasonable office hours.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 388, § 1.

54-03-31.
Federal health care reform law.

The legislative assembly declares that the federal laws known as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act [Pub. L. 111-148] and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 [Pub. L. 111-152] likely are not authorized by the United States Constitution and may violate its true meaning and intent as given by the founders and ratifiers.

The legislative assembly shall consider enacting any measure necessary to prevent the enforcement of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 within this state.

No provision of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act or the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 may interfere with an individual’s choice of a medical or insurance provider except as otherwise provided by the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 389, § 1.

54-03-32.
Review of presidential executive orders — Restriction.

The legislative management may review any executive order issued by the president of the United States which has not been affirmed by a vote of the Congress of the United States and signed into law as prescribed by the Constitution of the United States and recommend to the attorney general and the governor that the executive order be further reviewed. Upon recommendation from the legislative management, the attorney general shall review the executive order to determine the constitutionality of the order and whether the state should seek an exemption from the application of the order or seek to have the order declared to be an unconstitutional exercise of legislative authority by the president.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state, a political subdivision, or any other publicly funded organization may not implement an executive order if the attorney general issues an opinion that the executive order unconstitutionally restricts a person’s rights or has been found unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction and the executive order relates to:

Pandemics or other health emergencies;

The regulation of natural resources, including coal and oil;

The regulation of the agriculture industry;

The use of land;

The regulation of the financial sector as it relates to environmental, social, or governance standards; or

The regulation of the constitutional right to keep and bear arms.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 399, § 1; 2021, ch. 392, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

54-03-33.
Certification of delegates to United States convention of the states.

If a convention of the states is called pursuant to article V of the United States Constitution, the legislative assembly or an official designated by the legislative assembly shall certify each delegate and alternate delegate from this state to the convention and provide a written copy of the certification to each delegate and alternate delegate and to the convention. If a delegate is ineligible or unwilling to serve as a delegate at the convention, the legislative assembly or the official designated by the legislative assembly shall certify an alternate delegate to replace the delegate and immediately provide a copy of the certification to the delegate and the convention.

If a delegate is rendered ineligible to serve under subsection 4, the delegate’s certification must provide notice to the convention that any vote or other action taken by that delegate should be considered void.

An individual who has not been certified under this section may not serve as a delegate at the convention.

As a condition of being eligible for consideration or selection as a delegate or alternate delegate, each delegate and alternate delegate shall execute the following oath:

A delegate at the convention may not vote to allow consideration of or consider or approve any unauthorized amendment. An “unauthorized amendment” means:

A proposed amendment that varies from the exact text of the amendment contained in the application made by the legislative assembly, which limits the convention to approving or disapproving that exact text, or if the legislative assembly did not make the application, the exact text of the amendment contained in the applications relied upon by the United States Congress in calling the convention, if the application contains exact text for a proposed amendment; or

A proposed amendment that is outside the permitted subject matter of the application made by the legislative assembly, or if the legislative assembly did not make the application, the permitted subject matter of the applications relied upon by the United States Congress in calling the convention and as the subject matter may be further defined by the legislative assembly or an official designated by the legislative assembly, in instructions adopted by the legislative assembly by concurrent resolution and provided to each delegate and alternate delegate.

The legislative assembly or an official designated by the legislative assembly shall provide guidance upon the request of any delegate or alternate delegate as to whether a proposed amendment is within the permitted subject matter of the convention.

A delegate casting or attempting to cast a vote at a convention in violation of this section must be rendered ineligible to continue to serve as a delegate and must be immediately removed from office and replaced by an alternate delegate as provided under this section. A vote cast by a delegate at a convention which is in violation of this section is void.

I do solemnly swear or affirm that I will, to the best of my abilities, support the United States Constitution and the Constitution of North Dakota and I will not vote to allow consideration of or consider or approve any unauthorized amendment proposed for ratification to the United States Constitution. I understand that a violation of this oath will result in my being rendered ineligible to serve as a delegate at the convention as well as subject me to additional penalties under the laws of North Dakota.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 367, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

54-03-34.
Dynamic fiscal impact bill selection committee. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 364, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; expired by 2017, ch. 364, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.